Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-130
Board of directors; acquisition of property; corporate powers.

The board is hereby authorized and empowered to take conveyances or other assurances for all property acquired by it under the provisions of sections 46-101 to 46-1,111, in the name of such irrigation district, to and for the uses and purposes herein expressed, and to institute and maintain any and all actions and proceedings, suits at law or in equity, necessary or proper in order to fully carry out the provisions of said sections, or to enforce, maintain, protect or preserve any and all rights, privileges, and immunities created by said sections, or acquired in pursuance thereof. In all courts, actions, suits or proceedings, the board may sue, appear and defend, in person or by attorneys, and in the name of such irrigation district.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 12, p. 278;

R.S.1913, § 3468;

C.S.1922, § 2868;

C.S.1929, § 46-112;

R.S.1943, § 46-130.

Persons dealing with officers and agents of public corporation are required to act with reference to authority, limitations, and restrictions imposed by legislation authorizing organization and government thereof. Lincoln & Dawson County Irr. Dist. v. McNeal, 60 Neb. 613, 83 N.W. 847 (1900).